dicts/be_BY/be_BY.dic
абвалаклі/K
абварыць/lmwqot
абводніць/o
абгладзіць/kmsqot
абдадзім/K
абдадуць/q
абдзерці/K
абезгаловіць/mo
абераглі/K
аб'еў/K
абкласці/K
абкружыць/lmo
абкруціць/lmwqot
аблажыць/lmwq
аблепіць/ot
абліло/K
аблічыць/lmwqot
абложыць/ot
абнавіць/lmwq
абнасіць/lmwq
абносіць/ot
абпраменіць/mqot
абпякла/K
абсечаце/K
абсмажыцца/vj
абсмаліць/lmowqt
абтопчам/K
абтрэплем/K
абудзіць/lmwqot
абцёр/K
абцярэбіць/o
абчысціць/lmwqot
абчэпіць/ot
абяздоліць/kmo
абязлесіць/vf
аб'ясі/K
агаварыць/lmwq
агаліць/lmwq
агалосіць/o
агледзіць/otks
адатраце/K
адбеліць/o
адважыць/kmsqot
адваліць/lmwqot
адвернеце/K
адгодзіць/o
аддаліць/lmowqt
аддасі/K
ад'ездзіць/lmwqot
аджартуецца/t
адзоліць/o
адкаціць/lmwq
адколеце/K
адлепіць/o
адлупіцца/vj
адляжыць/ot
адляціць/otlw
адмучыцца/qt
аднесяце/K
адорыць/o
адпёк/K
адпросіцца/t
адпяражаш/K
адруліць/lmo
адседзець/kmsq
адступіць/lmwqot
адтопіцца/v
адтрубіць/lmo
адхіліць/lmwqot
адчапіць/lmwq
адчыніць/lmo
адчысціць/lmwqot
адшпіліцца/vj
адысці/K
ад'ясі/K
азарыцца/vj
аздаровіць/o
азлобіць/mqot
азнаёміць/mqot
акоціцца/v
акругліць/lmwqot
акружыць/lmo
анямечыць/moqt
апалячыць/kmosqt
апарожніцца/v
апечаце/K
апомніцца/wqt
апросціцца/t
апыліцца/vj
апыліць/lmo
апяражам/K
апяражуць/q
асіроціць/o
аскаліць/kmosqt
аскароміць/kmosqt
аслабаніць/lmwq
асмужыць/vf
астрыгла/K
асцерагчы/K
атаварыць/mqot
атрэсці/K
ахаладзіць/lmwq
ацерушыць/lmwq
ачмурыць/lmo
ачысціць/lmwqot
ашчацініцца/vj
бавіць/kmsqot
балабоніць/kmo
бараніць/lmwq
барвяніцца/vj
беліць/ot
беручы/K
бразджыць/ol
бруіць/vf
бэсціць/lmo
бянтэжыць/kmsqot
вазіць/lmwqp
валачы/K
валтузіць/kmsqot
варыць/lmwqot
ветрыць/mo
вёрз/K
вірыцца/vj
віць/fjlw
вучыць/lmwqot
выбеліць/lmo
вываліць/lmwqot
вывесці/fjK
выветрыцца/vj
выгаварыць/lmwqot
выганіць/o
выдзеліць/lmwqot
вызалаціць/lmo
вызваліць/lmwqot
выкрасліць/lmo
выкрышыцца/vj
выкуліць/lmwqot
выкупіць/lmowqt
вылечыць/kmsqot
вылупіць/lmwqot
вымачыць/lmwqot
выносіць/kmosqt
выплесці/fjK
выправіць/kmsqot
выпучыць/vf
высадзіць/lmwqot
выседзіць/o
выселіць/lmwqot
высіцца/vj
выстраіць/kmsqot
выходзіць/kmo
выцверазіць/lmowqt
выцерці/K
вычысціць/lmowqt
вярзлі/K
вяселіць/ot
галініцца/vq
галіць/lmwqp
ганарыцца/wqt
гані/K
гарыць/o
гняздзіцца/vq
голіць/otp
горбіць/lmwqot
грабяце/K
грэблі/K
дабяжыць/o
давазіць/lmwq
давалачы/K
даводзіць/kmoqt
давучыць/lmwqot
дагарыць/v
дазваніцца/wq
дайце/K
дакаціць/lmwq
далучыць/lmwqot
дамовіць/kmsqot
данесці/K
даскочыць/mo
дваіцца/q
двоіцца/v
дзяўбло/K
дзяцініцца/sqt
дражніць/lmwqot
дурыць/lmwqot
дыбіцца/vq
жарабіцца/q
жарыць/kmo
журчыць/v
жывіць/lmwqot
забраўшы/K
заварушыць/lmwqot
заварыцца/vq
заведзяце/K
завінаваціцца/sqt
завіць/fjlw
завялі/K
завярцець/lmwq
загаліць/lmwq
загасіць/lmo
загледзецца/sq
заглядзецца/wq
заглядзіцца/t
загноіцца/v
задай/K
задзерлі/K
заешце/K
зазвініць/v
заіскрыцца/vq
займу/gyK
закабаліць/kmosqt
закалаціць/lmwq
закарціць/v
закласці/fjK
заклеіць/kmo
закруціць/lmwqot
закупорыцца/vq
залежыцца/t
залечыцца/v
залічыць/lmwqot
заляціць/o
залячыцца/q
замасліць/lmwqot
замчыць/ot
замыліцца/vj
занасіцца/q
занеслі/K
занудзіцца/wqt
запарыць/kmsqot
запеніцца/vq
запляло/K
запозніцца/t
запомніць/lmwqot
запрапасціцца/wqt
зарадзіцца/qv
заседзіцца/t
заседзіць/v
засек/K
засланіць/lmwq
заслядзіць/lmo
засмужыць/vq
застракаціць/v
засцярог/K
затлуміцца/wqt
захапіць/lmwq
захламіць/mo
зачапіць/lmwq
зашавеліць/ot
зашпіліць/lmwqot
зашчапіць/lmwq
заядзім/K
звадзіць/lmwq
зважыць/kmosqt
звалаклі/K
зверыць/kmsqot
звольніць/lmwqot
звузіцца/vj
звяртаючы/K
згаворыцца/t
згадзіцца/q
згусціцца/vj
зджаліць/mo
здзівіць/lmwqot
здобрыцца/wqt
зіхаціць/v
злаўчыцца/wqt
злуючы/K
злюбіцца/vj
змарыць/lmwq
зменіць/ot
змікіціць/kmo
змірыць/lmwqot
змясціць/lmwq
знаёміць/mqotp
знесці/K
знішчыцца/vj
знясіліць/mqot
зойдзеш/K
зрушыць/kmsqot
з'явіцца/wqt
імжыць/v
іскрыцца/wqt
ісці/K
камечыцца/vp
каравіцца/vj
карміць/lmwqp
кароціць/o
касабочыцца/sqt
кволіцца/sqt
кіпяціць/lmwqotz
клеіцца/vj
кончыць/lmqot
кружыць/lmwqot
круцячы/K
крывіць/lmwqotp
крышыцца/vjp
крышыць/lmo
курыцца/vq
кусціцца/vj
лажыцца/tj
лепіцца/v
любіць/lmowqt
лячыць/lmwq
малодзіць/ot
маршчыніцца/vj
мерыцца/sqt
мігціць/v
мірыць/lmowqtp
моліць/ot
мочыцца/op
муціцца/vjzp
наадэкалоніць/kmosqt
наблізіць/kmosqt
навалачыцца/wq
наваліць/lmwqot
навалок/K
наварыцца/vj
навошчыць/o
навярэдзіць/kmosqt
нагасціцца/wq
нагосціцца/t
надарыцца/vj
надробіць/o
накаціць/lmwq
наколем/K
наладзіць/kmosqt
налажыць/lmwq
наложыць/ot
намыліць/kmosqt
напаскудзіць/kmo
напеяце/K
наплодзіцца/v
напросіць/ot
нарадзіць/lmwq
насварыцца/wqt
насініць/lmo
насурміць/lmowqt
насцеражыш/K
натоміць/ot
натравіць/lmo
натрусіцца/vj
натурыцца/sqt
натхніць/lmowqt
нахмурыць/kmosqt
нахохліць/vf
нацярпецца/wq
наясце/K
недаспіць/ol
нудзіцца/wqt
нудзіць/vf
няньчыць/lmwqot
паберагчы/K
павесіць/kmsqot
павысіць/kmosqt
павярну/gyK
пагоршыцца/vj
падбадзёрыць/kmosqt
падвернеш/K
падголіць/o
паддобрыцца/wqt
падзівіцца/wqt
падлабуніцца/wqt
падлечыць/ot
падломіцца/v
падпоіць/o
падпяражам/K
падрадзіць/lmowqt
падстроіць/kmosqt
падсуседзіцца/sqt
падхваліць/lmo
пазалазіць/vf
пакарыць/lmwq
пакаціць/lmwq
пакрыўдзіць/lmowqt
палепшыцца/vj
палоніць/o
памучыцца/sqt
панурыць/kmosqt
папакруціцца/wqt
папасці/fjK
папасядзіць/o
папералазіць/vf
папудзіцца/vj
папусціць/lmowqt
парушыцца/vj
паселіць/o
пасходзіць/vf
патоміцца/v
патроіцца/vj
паўлазіць/vf
паўторыць/ot
пацярпіць/o
пацясніць/lmowqt
пашырыцца/vj
паявіцца/wqt
пераварыцца/vj
перавесіць/kmsqot
перагладзіць/kmo
перагрызла/K
перазнаёміць/kmosqt
перакрывіць/lmowqt
пералічыць/lmo
перамясціць/lmwq
пераплёў/K
перапоўніцца/vj
перапудзіць/kmosqt
перасварыць/lmowqt
перасіліць/kmosqt
перасяліць/lmwq
ператоміць/ot
перачэрціць/o
песціць/lmowqt
пёк/K
плодзіцца/v
поўніць/vf
прабегчы/K
праваліць/lmowqt
праветрыць/lmwqot
правучыць/lmowqt
правяліцца/vj
прадзёўб/K
пражыцца/vj
пракорміць/ot
пракоціць/ot
пракурыць/lmowqt
праломіцца/v
прамасліць/lmowqt
прамчыць/ot
пранесці/K
прапыліць/lmowqt
прасаліць/kmosqt
прасвяціць/lmwq
праслязіцца/wqt
прасмажыцца/vj
пратачыць/lmwq
пратравіць/lmo
прахапіцца/wq
прахопіць/v
працвярэзіць/ot
працерці/K
прыадчыніцца/vj
прыбедніцца/wqt
прывучыць/lmowqt
прыгледзіць/ot
прыгорнеш/K
прыйшоў/K
прыклеіцца/vj
прылажыць/lmwq
прылаўчыцца/wqt
прылучыць/lmowqt
прыляціць/o
прыпазніцца/wq
прыпудрыць/lmowqt
прысніць/lmowqt
прыставіць/kmo
прыступіць/lmowqt
прытворыцца/t
прытраце/K
прытупіцца/vj
прыходзіць/kmosqt
прыцаніцца/wq
прычасціць/lmowqt
пудрыць/lmowqtp
пустошыць/kmo
пушыць/vf
рабіць/lmwqp
разбалбочам/K
разбаліцца/v
разбубніцца/wqt
разбуяніцца/wqt
развяла/K
развяселіцца/t
разгаласіцца/wq
разгалініцца/vj
разгародзіць/ot
разгарыцца/tw
разгняздзіцца/wq
разгрузіць/lmowqt
разгультаіцца/sqt
раздзерці/K
раз'ездзіць/lmowqt
раззброіць/kmsqot
разлічыць/lmowqt
разложыць/ot
разляцецца/wq
размножыцца/vj
разупэўніць/lmowqt
раз'юшыць/kmsqot
разявіць/kmsqot
раскалмаціцца/vj
раскіпецца/wq
распастраце/K
распаўсюдзіцца/vj
распесціць/lmowqt
распрэгла/K
распусціць/lmowqt
рассупоніцца/vj
рассядзецца/wq
растрасяце/K
раструшчыць/lmo
расхрабрыцца/wqt
расцярушыцца/v
расшавеліць/ot
расшумецца/wq
родніць/v
румяніць/kmosqt
сабраўшы/K
самавызначыцца/sqt
самазаспакоіцца/sqt
самаўхіліцца/wqt
сашчэміцца/v
свінячыць/kmo
скамечыцца/v
скапуціцца/sqt
скардзіцца/wqtp
скасіць/lmwq
сколеце/K
скруціць/lmwqot
скупіцца/wqtp
скурчыць/lmowqt
скучыцца/vj
славіць/kmosqt
спаліць/lmo
спесціцца/wqt
сплесці/K
споўніцца/vj
справіць/kmosqt
спыніць/lmwqot
спякла/K
сселіць/o
стварожыцца/vj
струменіць/vf
стрыжаце/K
стуліць/lmowqt
ступіць/lmo
сурміць/lmowqt
суцешыць/kmosqt
сцелем/Kp
сцэдзіць/o
сцярог/K
счапіць/lmwq
тармазіцца/qz
таросіцца/v
томіць/ot
топчам/K
трушчыцца/vj
трэплеш/Kp
тышчыцца/wqt
ўбавіць/kmou
ўвільгатніцца/vju
ўглыбіцца/qtu
ўдарыўшы/Ku
ўеш/Ku
ўжывіць/lmou
ўзбіць/fjlwu
ўзвалок/Ku
ўзлахмаціць/kmosqtu
ўкароціцца/vu
ўкароціць/ou
ўколеш/Ku
ўлажыць/lmwqu
ўмовіцца/qtu
ўмоліць/ou
ўпёр/Ku
ўскварыцца/qvu
ўскладніць/lmou
ўскруціцца/wqtu
ўскудлаціць/kmsqotu
ўспораце/Ku
ўстапырыцца/vju
ўтаміцца/wq
ўтапіць/lmwqu
ўтоміцца/t
ўтуліць/kmsqotu
ўцёр/Ku
ўядуць/qu
хандрыць/lmo
хваліць/lmowqtp
целіцца/v
цёр/Kp
цэліць/kmosqt
цярушыцца/v
цяслярыць/kmo
чапіць/lmwq
чубіць/lmowqt
шнырыць/mo
шчэміць/v
